Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1572
Appropriation and salary limit of Department of Natural Resources; how treated.

Any appropriation and salary limit provided in any legislative bill enacted by the One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, to Agency No. 29, Department of Natural Resources, shall be null and void, and any such amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. 84, Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. Any financial obligations of the Department of Natural Resources that remain unpaid as of June 30, 2025, and that are subsequently certified as valid encumbrances to the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04, shall be paid by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment from the unexpended balance of appropriations existing in such program classifications on June 30, 2025.

Laws 2025, LB317, § 2.